Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-190
Act, how cited.

Sections
81-173 to 81-190 shall be known and
may be cited as the Deferred Building Renewal Act.

Laws 1977, LB 309, § 18;

Laws 1998, LB 1100, § 20;

Laws 1999, LB 369, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB228, § 2.